District of Columbia statutes.
28:3-114

Contradictory terms of instrument.

If an instrument contains contradictory terms, typewritten terms prevail over printed terms, handwritten terms prevail over both, and words prevail over numbers.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(d), 42 DCR 467
1981 Ed., § 28:3-114.
1973 Ed., § 28:3-118.
Section 3-114 replaces subsections (b) and (c) of former Section 3-118.